Louisiana, session 2026, HB681.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9091.1(F)(1)(b) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§9091.1. Lakeview Crime Prevention District
* * *
F. Parcel fee. The governing authority of the city of New Orleans is hereby
authorized to impose and collect a parcel fee within the district subject to and in
accordance with the provisions of this Subsection:
(1)
* * *
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph,
the amount of the fee may be increased, not to exceed one two hundred fifty dollars
per parcel per year, as provided in this Subparagraph. The new fee amount shall be
as provided by duly adopted resolution of the board of commissioners of the district
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 681 ENROLLED
and approved by a majority of the registered voters of the district voting on the
proposition at an election held for that purpose in accordance with the Louisiana
Election Code. Such election shall be held only if requested by duly adopted
resolution of the board of commissioners of the district.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.